Utah statutes.
70A-3-412.   Obligation of issuer of note or cashier's check.
The issuer of a note or cashier's check or other draft drawn on the drawer is
obliged to pay the instrument according to its terms at the time it was issued
or, if not issued, at the time it first came into possession of a holder, or
if the issuer signed an incomplete instrument, according to its terms when
completed, to the extent stated in Sections 70A-3-115 and 70A-3-407.  The
obligation is owed to a person entitled to enforce the instrument or to an
indorser who paid the instrument under Section 70A-3-415.
